Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.060

Termination of municipal court—Requirements—Establishment of court.

A city or town electing to establish a municipal court pursuant to this chapter may terminate such court by adoption of an appropriate ordinance. However no municipal court may be terminated unless the municipality has complied with RCW 3.50.805, 3.50.810, 35.22.425, * 35.23.595, 35.23.555, 35.27.515, 35.30.100, and 35A.11.200.

A city or town newly establishing a municipal court pursuant to this chapter shall do so by adoption of an appropriate ordinance as provided in RCW 3.50.010.

[ 2024 c 61 s 2; 1984 c 258 s 108; 1961 c 299 s 55.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.23.595 was repealed by 1994 c 81 s 89.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.